Hawaii statutes.
[§30-2] Definition.
"Governor-elect" means the person who is the apparent successful
candidate for the office of governor, as ascertained by the chief election
officer following the general election. [L 1972, c 126, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next